District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-325

Deposit of receipts; sinking fund; statement showing costs of construction of Stadium.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 7, 1957, 71 Stat. 621, Pub. L. 85-300, § 6
July 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 422, Pub. L. 85-561, § 1(12)
Sept. 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 702, Pub. L. 86-378, § 1(6), (7)
Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-113, § 3, 23 DCR 8742
June 14, 1980, D.C. Law 3-70, § 7(p), 27 DCR 1776
Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-152, § 21(a)(3), 41 DCR 4636

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-325.
1973 Ed., § 2-1724.

Transfer of Functions

See note to § 3-321.

Editor's Notes

Effect of dissolution of Sports Commission: See note to § 3-321.

Construction of Law 10-152: See note to § 3-321.